Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6209.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1230j. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, board of directors of a public school academy, or governing body of a public school shall not hire or continue to employ, in any capacity, an individual who was previously employed by any of the following organizations between September 1, 2025 and January 20, 2029: (a) The United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. (b) The United States Customs and Border Protection. (c) The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.